Utah statutes.
31A-18-108.   Investment of excess surplus.

(1)  If an insurer has excess surplus, as defined under Section 31A-1-301, then to the extent of its excess surplus, the insurer may invest in a manner inconsistent with the limitations of Section 31A-18-106 or in other assets approved by the commissioner.

(2)  This section does not empower any insurer to make investments that are:

(a)  illegal; or

(b)  prohibited under Section 31A-4-107.

(3)  Each insurer has the burden of establishing the extent of its excess surplus.



Amended by Chapter 131, 1999 General Session

